Utah statutes.
17-27a-523.   Boundary line agreement.

(1)  As used in this section, "boundary line agreement" is an agreement described in Section 57-1-45.

(2)  A property owner:

(a)  may execute a boundary line agreement; and

(b)  shall record a boundary line agreement in the office of the county recorder.

(3)  A boundary line agreement is not subject to the review of a land use authority.



Enacted by Chapter 334, 2013 General Session

